Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-2,116.01
Application for instream appropriation; use of stored water; study.

If the Chief Water Officer determines that there is insufficient unappropriated natural flow available for an application for an instream appropriation and if the applicant consents, the Chief Water Officer may conduct a study to determine whether the instream flow needs can be met through the use of stored water in new storage facilities. The study shall address the availability of storage sites, the estimated cost of providing any required storage, and such other findings and conclusions as the Chief Water Officer deems appropriate.

Laws 1985, LB 102, § 19;

Laws 1991, LB 772, § 6;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 148;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 132.